Washington statutes.
RCW 18.165.040

Armed private investigator license—Requirements.

(1) An applicant must meet the following minimum requirements to obtain an armed private investigator license:

(a) Be licensed as a private investigator;

(b) Be at least twenty-one years of age;

(c) Have a current firearms certificate issued by the commission;

(d) Have a license to carry a concealed pistol; and

(e) Pay the fee established by the director.

(2) The armed private investigator license may take the form of an endorsement to the private investigator license if deemed appropriate by the director.

[ 1995 c 277 s 21; 1991 c 328 s 4.]